District of Columbia statutes.
34-1671.10

Jurisdiction of the Commission and the Office of the People’s Counsel.

(a)

(1)

The Commission shall have jurisdiction upon the complaint of any person, the People’s Counsel, or on its own initiative regarding the provision by a licensed natural gas supplier of any service for which it is subject to licensure.

(2)

The Commission shall have jurisdiction upon the complaint of any person, the People’s Counsel, or on its own initiative to determine whether a licensed natural gas supplier has violated or failed to comply with any provision of this chapter regarding retail natural gas sales for which it is subject to licensure or any regulation, rule, or order adopted or issued by the Commission.

(3)

The Commission, after reasonable notice and opportunity for hearing, may conduct an investigation, and impose a penalty, for any violation of this chapter or any regulation or order adopted or issued by the Commission.

(b)

The People’s Counsel may file a complaint under any provision of this chapter.

(c)

The Commission shall, by regulation or order, establish procedures for complaints and for resolving disputes between the gas company, natural gas suppliers, and customers.

Mar. 16, 2005, D.C. Law 15-227, § 11, 51 DCR 10549